Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 13. Driving on Right Side of Roadway: Overtaking and Passing; Following.

§ 63-3-601.
Vehicles to be driven on right half of roadway; exceptions.

Upon all roadways of sufficient width a vehicle shall be driven upon the right half of the roadway, except as follows:

1. When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing such movement;

2. When the right half of a roadway is closed to traffic while under construction or repair;

3. Upon a roadway divided into three marked lanes for traffic under the rules applicable thereon; or

4. Upon a roadway designated and signposted for one-way traffic.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8181; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-603.
Driving on roadways laned for traffic.

Whenever any roadway has been divided into three (3) or more clearly marked lanes for traffic, except through or bypassing a municipality, the following rules in addition to all others consistent herewith shall apply:

A vehicle shall be driven as nearly as practical entirely within a single lane and shall not be moved from such lane until the driver has first ascertained that such movement can be made with safety.

A vehicle shall not be driven in the center lane upon a roadway which is divided into three (3) lanes except when:

Overtaking and passing another vehicle where the roadway is clearly visible and such center lane is clear of traffic within a safe distance;

Such vehicle is in preparation for a left turn; or

Such center lane is at the time allocated exclusively to traffic moving in the direction such vehicle is proceeding and is signposted to give notice of such allocation.

Official signs may be erected directing slow-moving traffic to use a designated lane or allocating specified lanes to traffic moving in the same direction, and drivers of vehicles shall obey the directions of every such sign.

Upon all roadways any vehicle proceeding at less than the normal speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing shall be driven in the right-hand lane then available for traffic, or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway, except when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction or when preparing for a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway.

Persons riding bicycles upon a roadway shall not ride more than two (2) abreast except on paths or parts of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles. Persons riding two (2) abreast shall not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic and, on a laned roadway, shall ride within a single lane.

A vehicle shall not be driven in the outermost left lane of any roadway with two (2) or more lanes allowing for movement of traffic in the same direction except when:

Overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction under the rules governing such movement;

The right lane(s) of a roadway is closed to traffic while under construction or repair;

The right lane(s) of the roadway is in disrepair or in an otherwise impassable or unsafe condition; or

A vehicle is preparing to exit the roadway on the left.

A vehicle shall not be driven continuously in the outermost left lane of a multi-lane roadway whenever it impedes the flow of other traffic.

A violation of this subsection (2) is punishable by a fine of not less than Five Dollars ($5.00) nor more than Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8187; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1977, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 350, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1983; Laws, 2018, ch. 360, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 63-3-605.
Driving upon one-way roadways and around rotary traffic islands.

Upon a roadway designated and signposted for one-way traffic a vehicle shall be driven only in the direction designated.

A vehicle passing around a rotary traffic island shall be driven only to the right of such island.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8186; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-607.
Passing by vehicles proceeding in opposite directions.

Drivers of vehicles proceeding in opposite directions shall pass each other to the right. Upon roadways having width for not more than one line of traffic in each direction each driver shall give to the other at least one-half of the main traveled portion of the roadway as nearly as possible.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8182: Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-609.
Overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in same direction.

The following rules shall govern the overtaking and passing of vehicles proceeding in the same direction, subject to those limitations, exceptions and special rules otherwise provided in this article:

The driver of a vehicle overtaking another vehicle proceeding in the same direction shall pass to the left thereof at a safe distance and shall not again drive to the right side of the roadway until safely clear of the overtaken vehicle.

Except when overtaking and passing on the right is permitted, the driver of an overtaken vehicle shall give way to the right in favor of the overtaking vehicle on audible signal and shall not increase the speed of his vehicle until completely passed by the overtaking vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8183; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-611.
Overtaking and passing vehicles on left side of roadway.

No vehicle shall be driven to the left side of the center of the roadway in overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction unless such left side is clearly visible and is free of oncoming traffic for a sufficient distance ahead to permit such overtaking and passing to be completely made without interfering with the safe operation of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction or any vehicle overtaken. In every event the overtaking vehicle must return to the right-hand side of the roadway before coming within one hundred (100) feet of any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction.

No vehicle shall, in overtaking and passing another vehicle or at any other time, be driven to the left side of the roadway under the following conditions:

When approaching the crest of a grade or upon a curve in the highway where the driver’s view along the highway is obstructed;

When approaching within one hundred (100) feet of any marked or readily distinguishable bridge, viaduct or tunnel on any roadway other than a four-lane roadway;

When approaching within one hundred (100) feet of or traversing any marked or readily distinguishable intersection or railroad grade crossing;

When official signs are in place directing that traffic keep to the right, or a distinctive center line is marked, which distinctive line also so directs traffic as declared in the sign manual adopted by the State Transportation Commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8185; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1991, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 447, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1997).

§ 63-3-613.
Overtaking and passing upon right of another vehicle.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and pass upon the right of another vehicle which is making or about to make a left turn.

The driver of a vehicle may overtake and, allowing sufficient clearance, pass another vehicle proceeding in the same direction either upon the left or upon the right on a roadway with unobstructed pavement of sufficient width for four (4) or more lines of moving traffic when such movement can be made in safety. The left lane shall be the preferred passing lane. No person shall drive off the pavement or upon the shoulder of the roadway overtaking or passing on the right.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8184; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1977, ch. 321, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 4, 1977).

§ 63-3-615.
Meeting or overtaking school bus.

The driver of a vehicle upon a street or highway upon meeting or overtaking any school bus that has stopped on the street or highway for the purpose of receiving or discharging any school children shall come to a complete stop at least ten (10) feet from the school bus before reaching the school bus when there is in operation on the school bus the flashing red lights provided in Section 63-7-23, or when a retractable, hand-operated stop sign is extended; the driver shall not proceed until the children have crossed the street or highway and the school bus has resumed motion or the flashing red lights are no longer actuated and the hand-operated stop sign is retracted.

The driver of a vehicle upon a divided highway that has four (4) lanes or more and permits at least two (2) lanes of traffic to travel in opposite directions need not stop upon meeting or passing a school bus that is stopped in the opposing roadway, or if the school bus is stopped in a loading zone that is a part of or adjacent to the highway and where pedestrians are not permitted to cross the roadway.

Except as provided in paragraph (b), any person violating the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon a first conviction thereof shall be fined not less than Three Hundred Fifty Dollars ($350.00) nor more than Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00), or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both. For a second or subsequent offense, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), or imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both. In addition, the Commissioner of Public Safety or his duly authorized designee, after conviction for a second or subsequent offense and upon receipt of the court abstract, shall suspend the driver’s license and driving privileges of the person for a period of ninety (90) days.

A conviction under this section for a violation resulting in any injury to a child who is in the process of boarding or exiting a school bus shall be a violation of Section 97-3-7, and a violator shall be punished under subsection (2) of that section.

This section shall be applicable only in the event the school bus shall bear upon the front and rear thereon a plainly visible sign containing the words “school bus” in letters not less than four (4) inches in height.

If any person witnesses the driver of any vehicle violating the provisions of this section and the identity of the driver of the vehicle is not otherwise apparent, it shall be a rebuttable inference that the person in whose name the vehicle is registered committed the violation. If charges are filed against multiple owners of a motor vehicle, only one (1) of the owners may be convicted and court costs may be assessed against only one (1) of the owners. If the vehicle that is involved in the violation is registered in the name of a rental or leasing company and the vehicle is rented or leased to another person at the time of the violation, the rental or leasing company may rebut the inference of guilt by providing the law enforcement officer or prosecuting authority with a copy of the rental or lease agreement in effect at the time of the violation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8226; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 341; Laws, 1946, ch. 420, § 10; Laws, 1974, ch. 304; Laws, 1986, ch. 368; Laws, 2011, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 340, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-3-616.
Blocking certain lanes of traffic by school bus driver permitted for the purpose of preventing being overtaken when receiving or discharging passengers.

A school bus driver, for the purpose of preventing being overtaken when receiving or discharging any school children, may stop on a street or highway blocking the two (2) outermost right lanes, regardless of the number of lanes on the street or highway. For a two-lane street or highway, this provision allows for blocking both lanes. Such school bus driver may only block both of these lanes during the time that the school bus is receiving or discharging any school children.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 352, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-3-617.
Driving in center of highway; refusal to turn to right to allow overtaking vehicle to pass.

It shall be unlawful for the driver of any truck or other vehicle to drive in or near the center of any highway for a distance of more than two hundred yards, or at any time to refuse to turn to the right in order that any driver desiring to pass said truck or other vehicle, may drive at a higher legal rate of speed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8188; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1962, ch. 525, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1962).

§ 63-3-619.
Distances to be maintained between traveling vehicles; inapplicability to operators of nonlead vehicles in a platoon under certain circumstances; requirement for operation of platoon.

The driver of a motor vehicle shall not follow another vehicle more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard for the speed of such vehicles and the traffic upon and the condition of the highway.

The driver of any motor truck or motor truck drawing another vehicle when traveling upon a roadway outside of a business or residence district shall not follow within three hundred (300) feet of another motor truck or motor truck drawing another vehicle. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to prevent overtaking and passing nor shall the same apply upon any lane specially designated for use by motor trucks.

Subject to the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection, subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to the operator of a nonlead vehicle in a platoon, as defined in Section 63-3-103(k), as long as the platoon is operating on a limited access divided highway with more than one (1) lane in each direction and the platoon consists of not more than two (2) motor vehicles.

A platoon may be operated in this state only after an operator files a plan for approval of general platoon operations with the Department of Transportation. If that department approves the submission, it shall forward the plan to the Department of Public Safety for approval. The plan shall be reviewed and either approved or disapproved by the Department of Transportation and the Department of Public Safety within thirty (30) days after it is filed. If approved by both departments, the operator shall be allowed to operate the platoon five (5) working days after plan approval. The Motor Carrier Division of the Department of Public Safety shall develop the acceptable standards required for each portion of the plan.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8188; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1962, ch. 525, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1962); Laws, 2018, ch. 445, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 2019.

§ 63-3-621.
Distance to be maintained between vehicle and traveling or parked fire apparatus or traveling or parked ambulance on emergency call.

The driver of any vehicle other than one on official business shall not follow any fire apparatus traveling in response to a fire alarm closer than five hundred (500) feet or drive into or park such vehicle within the block where fire apparatus has stopped in answer to a fire alarm. The driver of any vehicle other than an official emergency vehicle shall not follow any moving ambulance that is engaged in an emergency medical call closer than five hundred (500) feet, or park the vehicle within two hundred (200) feet of where the ambulance has stopped to pick up or deliver a patient or otherwise render care at the scene of an ambulance call.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8223; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2004, ch. 425, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.